Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-412
Fee.

In addition to any fee authorized under section 33-133, an online notary public or his or her employer may charge a fee in an amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars for each online notarial act.

Laws 2019, LB186, § 12.